Massachusetts, session 194th, S2873.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a special commission on micro-transit to study existing and emerging
micro-transit services and recommend ways to fund, support, and expand said services in the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts. The study shall include, but not be limited to: (i) an evaluation
of various types of micro-transit services, the needs of populations that depend on micro-transit
services, and micro-transit services available in the Commonwealth including, but not limited to,
those operated by a regional transit authority and those operated by other entities; (ii) a review of
existing funding mechanisms that support micro-transit services in the Commonwealth,
including whether said funding mechanisms meet the demand for micro-transit services, or allow
for the expansion of micro-transit services; (iii) recommendations to rationalize funding
mechanisms that support micro-transit services including, but not limited to, options for
dedicated state funding to support micro-transit services; (iv) recommendations to define micro-
transit services in statute for the purpose of determining eligibility for state funding; and (v)
recommendations for how micro-transit services can be used to close mobility gaps, enhance
of 2

connectivity across existing transit services, and address inequities in transportation access for
certain geographies and populations.
The commission shall consist of the following members or their designees: the house and
senate chairs of the joint committee on transportation, or their designees who shall serve as co-
chairs; 2 persons to be appointed by the Massachusetts Association of Regional Transit
Authorities, both of whom shall be former or current administrators of a regional transit authority
and 1 of whom represents a regional transit authority that serves rural communities and 1 of
whom represents a regional transit authority that has offered micro-transit services; the
administrator of the rail and transit division of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation,
or designee; 2 persons representing existing or emerging micro-transit service operated by an
entity that is not a regional transit authority; 1 person representing Transportation for
Massachusetts; 1 person representing the Massachusetts Councils on Aging; 1 person appointed
by the Massachusetts Municipal Association who represents a municipality sponsoring or
operating a micro-transit service; 1 person appointed by MassHire Department of Career
Services who shall represent an office of MassHire Department of Career Services in a rural
community; and 1 person appointed by Massachusetts Association of Regional Planning
Agencies who shall represent a regional planning agency from a region with a majority of rural
communities.
The commission shall file a final report of its study and recommendations with the clerks
of the senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways and means,
the joint committee on transportation and the secretary of transportation not later than 15 months
after this section takes effect; provided, however, that the commission may make a draft report
available to the public for comment before filing its final report.
of 2